Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB619.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE VII-AEMPLOYEE VOTER LEAVESection 701-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 123456789101112131415161718192021 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Employee." An individual employed by a public or private entity.Section 702-A. Time off to vote.(a) Authorization.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation and in accordance with subsection (b), an employee may, without loss of pay or vacation or other leave, take off enough working time that, when added to the voting time available outside of working hours, will enable the employee to vote.(b) Limitations.--(1) An employer is only required to allow for a total of two hours of time off for voting by an employee without loss of pay.(2) Time off for voting shall be at the beginning or end of the regular working shift, whichever allows the most free time for voting and the least time off from the regular working shift, unless a different time is otherwise mutually agreed to by the employer and employee.(c) Notice.--If, on the third working day prior to an election, an employee knows or has reason to believe that time off will be necessary to allow the employee to vote, the employee shall give the employer at least two working days' notice that the employee requires time off in accordance with this section.(d) Prohibition.--An employer may not ask an employee to divulge any information about the employee's party affiliation or registration or any information on how the employee will vote or whether the employee voted for or against any candidate or ballot question.20250HB0619PN0630 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 703-A. Verification of employee voting.(a) Proof of voting.--Presentation of written evidence of voting, as signed or stamped by an election officer, shall constitute proof of voting by the employee.(b) Failure to verify.--If an employee fails to verify voting after taking time off for that purpose in accordance with section 702-A, the employer may make appropriate deductions from the salary or wages of the employee for the period during which the employee is entitled to be absent from employment.Section 704-A. Notice of leave allowance.(a) Posting required.--Not less than 10 days before an election, every employer shall keep posted conspicuously at the place of employment, if practicable, or elsewhere in the workplace where it can be seen as employees enter and leave, a notice providing the provisions of this article.(b) Uniform notice.--(1) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall develop a uniform notice for posting by employers in accordance with subsection (a) and shall make the notice available for download and printing on the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) The uniform notice shall be in English and other languages that reflect the ethnic and racial demographics of this Commonwealth.(3) The uniform notice shall not indicate or relay any information related to or require information on party affiliation, registration or how an employee will vote.Section 705-A. Failure to comply.An employer that refuses an employee time off to vote as required under this article, subjects an employee to a penalty 20250HB0619PN0630 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or deduction of wages because of the exercise of the right to time off work to vote or directly or indirectly violates this article shall be subject to a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500 for each violation.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0619PN0630 - 4 - 12345